Utah statutes.
36-16a-108.   Canvass of returns.

(1)  The county legislative body shall conduct a public canvass of the returns from the opinion question election no later than 14 days after the election.

(2)  Each election official shall:

(a)  make a certified abstract of the record of the canvassers detailing the votes cast on the opinion question; and

(b)  seal the transcript, endorse it "Election Returns," and transmit it to the lieutenant governor's office so that the lieutenant governor receives it by the fifth day before the day designated for the meeting of the state board of canvassers.

(3)  The state board of canvassers established by Section 20A-4-306 shall meet to compute and determine the vote on the opinion question.

(4)  After consulting existing statutes governing elections, the lieutenant governor may determine any issues relating to the canvassing process that are not governed by this section.

